Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Underground Coal Mining Adjacent to Oil and Gas Exploration

353.735.
Public policy concerning underground coal mining adjacent to oil and gas exploration activities.

It is hereby declared the public policy of the Commonwealth to provide for the safety of underground coal miners employed in areas near or adjacent to oil and gas exploration activities while furthering the policy of the Commonwealth as stated in KRS

353.500

with respect to the conservation and encouragement of exploration and development of oil and gas resources.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 79, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

353.737.
Location of well drilled through workable coal bed to be provided.

In order to collect and provide accurate information regarding the location of a well drilled through a workable coal bed, the well operator shall, within thirty (30) days following the drilling of the well, provide to the division a plat which shows the well’s as-drilled location and elevation. The plat shall be certified as accurate by a professional land surveyor licensed in accordance with KRS Chapter 322 and shall be provided in addition to the plat accompanying the application for permit, which is required under KRS 353.590(6). The as-drilled well location plat required by this section shall provide coordinates in feet units, using NAD 83, with Single Zone Projection as those terms are defined in KRS

353.010

.

A well shall be deemed to be in compliance with applicable permit requirements if the as-drilled location of the well is:

At the surface, within fifteen (15) feet of the location specified in the permit to drill; and

Drilled through the base of the lowest workable coal bed within one hundred fifty (150) feet from the true vertical of the as-drilled surface location.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 79, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 21, § 19, effective June 24, 2015.

353.739.
Survey required for well drilled in an active mining area or through a workable coal bed.

Within ten (10) days of the drilling of the well, the well operator shall have performed, at its expense, a directional survey for any well drilled in an active mining area or an inclination survey for any well drilled through a workable coal bed that is not in an active mining area.

If, as a result of the as-drilled well location plat prepared pursuant to KRS

353.735

or the directional or inclination survey performed under subsection (1) of this section, it is determined that a well or any portion of a well has been drilled at either a surface location or a subsurface location at the base of the lowest workable coal bed that is not in compliance with the allowable distances established in KRS 353.737(2), as well as the spacing requirements of KRS

353.610

, then the well operator shall promptly notify the Division of Oil and Gas of the noncompliance. The division shall order the well operator to remediate the noncompliance to bring the well within the allowable distances that have been exceeded. If the division determines that the well’s permit conditions cannot be satisfied by remediation or that the well operator is unable to satisfactorily meet the ordered remediation, then the division shall order the well to be plugged and abandoned.

No remediation shall be required under subsection (2) of this section if:

A directional survey indicates that the well is not in compliance with the allowable distance established in KRS 353.737(2)(b), but the well is in compliance with the spacing requirements of KRS

353.610

; and

The well operator receives a waiver for the noncompliance from the coal operator or permittee.

No remediation shall be required under subsection (2) of this section if:

An inclination survey indicates that the well is not in compliance with the allowable distances established in KRS 353.737(2), but the well is in compliance with the spacing requirements of KRS

353.610

; and

The well operator performs or causes to be performed a directional survey to identify the correct subsurface location of the wellbore.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 79, § 4, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 1912, effective July 15, 2010.

353.741.
Survey required when requested for well drilled outside an active mining area.

Upon the request of a coal operator, a well operator shall perform or cause to be performed a directional survey on any well drilled outside an active mining area within sixty (60) days of the request. The coal operator shall pay all actual costs associated with the survey. The coal operator shall indemnify the well operator for any damages that are incurred as a result of the performance of the directional survey, but the coal operator shall not be liable for any loss of revenue incurred as a result of a reasonable shut-in period during which the directional survey is conducted.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 79, § 5, effective June 25, 2009.

353.743.
Copy of survey to be provided to Division of Oil and Gas.

A coal, oil, or gas operator that has a directional or inclination survey performed pursuant to KRS

353.737

and

353.739

shall provide a copy of the survey to the Division of Oil and Gas. The division shall be responsible for reasonably maintaining and updating all information required by this chapter regarding oil and gas wells.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 79, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 1913, effective July 15, 2010.

353.745.
Location of well’s gathering lines to be marked.

For gathering lines installed across terrain with a slope of greater than twenty degrees (20°), the well operator shall mark the location of the gathering lines with line markers at interval distances not to exceed two hundred fifty (250) feet.

The Division of Oil and Gas shall make available on its Web site maps or other relevant information showing the location of gathering lines, as filed by the well operator, within thirty (30) days of the information being filed.

Prior to the issuance of a permit to drill, the division shall determine whether the proposed well will intersect an active mining area by reviewing the pertinent mine maps filed with the Division of Mine Safety. If the proposed well will intersect with an active mining area, the Division of Oil and Gas shall:

Determine whether the coal mine permittee has been properly notified pursuant to KRS

353.050

; and

Issue the permit to drill on the condition that a directional survey be performed pursuant to KRS 353.739(1).

In order to perform the duties under this section, the Division of Oil and Gas shall create and adequately staff the positions required to perform the duties. The division may charge an administrative fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) per permit application to perform its duties under this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 79, § 7, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 1914, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 87, § 38, effective June 24, 2015.

353.747.
KRS 353.735 to 353.747 not to affect well spacing requirements.

Nothing in KRS

353.735

to

353.747

shall be deemed an impairment or diminution of correlative rights or a modification of the well spacing requirements in KRS

353.610

, except as specifically provided otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 79, § 8, effective June 25, 2009.